Utah statutes.
61-2c-205.   Term of licensure -- Renewal -- Reporting of changes.
(1) (a)  A license under this chapter is valid for one year.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), the time period of a license may be
extended or shortened by as much as one year to maintain or change a renewal
cycle established by rule by the division.
(2)  To renew a license, no later than the date the license expires, a
licensee shall:
(a) (i)  file the renewal form required by the division; and
(ii)  furnish the information required by Subsection 61-2c-202(1);
(b)  pay a fee to the division established by the division in accordance with
Section 63J-1-504; and
(c)  if the licensee is an individual and the individual's license is in
active status at the time of application for renewal, submit proof using forms
approved by the division of having completed during the year before
application the continuing education required under Section 61-2c-204.1.
(3) (a)  A licensee under this chapter shall notify the division using the
form required by the division within 10 days of the date on which there is a
change in:
(i)  a name under which the licensee transacts the business of residential
mortgage loans in this state;
(ii) (A)  if the licensee is an entity, the business location of the licensee;
or
(B)  if the licensee is an individual, the home and business addresses of the
individual;
(iii)  the principal lending manager of the entity;
(iv)  the entity with which an individual licensee is licensed to conduct the
business of residential mortgage loans; or
(v)  any other information that is defined as material by rule made by the
division.
(b)  Failure to notify the division of a change described in Subsection (3)(a)
is separate grounds for disciplinary action against a licensee.
(4)  A licensee shall notify the division by sending the division a signed
statement within 10 business days of:
(a) (i)  a conviction of a criminal offense;
(ii)  the entry of a plea in abeyance to a criminal offense; or
(iii)  the potential resolution of a criminal case by:
(A)  a diversion agreement; or
(B)  any other agreement under which a criminal charge is held in suspense for
a period of time;
(b)  filing a personal bankruptcy or bankruptcy of a business that transacts
the business of residential mortgage loans;
(c)  the suspension, revocation, surrender, cancellation, or denial of a
professional license or professional registration of the licensee, whether the
license or registration is issued by this state or another jurisdiction; or
(d)  the entry of a cease and desist order or a temporary or permanent
injunction:
(i)  against the licensee by a court or licensing agency; and
(ii)  based on:
(A)  conduct or a practice involving the business of residential mortgage
loans; or
(B)  conduct involving fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit.
(5) (a)  A license under this chapter expires if the licensee does not apply
to renew the license on or before the expiration date of the license.
(b)  Within 30 calendar days after the expiration date, a licensee whose
license has expired may apply to reinstate the expired license by:
(i)  paying a renewal fee and a late fee determined by the division under
Section 63J-1-504; and
(ii)  if the licensee is an individual and is applying to reinstate a license
to active status, providing proof using forms approved by the division of
having completed, during the year before application, the continuing education
required under Section 61-2c-204.1.
(c)  After the 30 calendar days described in Subsection (5)(b) and within six
months after the expiration date, a licensee whose license has expired may
apply to reinstate an expired license by:
(i)  paying a renewal fee and a late fee determined by the division under
Section 63J-1-504;
(ii)  if the licensee is an individual and is applying to reinstate a license
to active status, providing proof using forms approved by the division of
having completed, during the year before application, the continuing education
required under Section 61-2c-204.1; and
(iii)  in addition to the continuing education described in Subsection
(5)(c)(ii), providing proof of completing an additional 12 hours of continuing
education meeting the requirements of Section 61-2c-204.1.
(d)  The division shall issue a license to a licensee whose license expires
under this Subsection (5) for more than six months as if the licensee is a new
applicant filing an application for an original license under Section
61-2c-202.
(e)  Notwithstanding Subsection (5)(a), the division may extend the term of a
license that would expire under Subsection (5)(a) except for the extension if:
(i)  the person complies with the requirements of this section to renew the
license; and
(ii)  at the time of the extension, there is pending under this chapter:
(A)  the application for renewal of the license; or
(B)  a disciplinary action.
(6)  The division may charge a fee established in accordance with Section
63J-1-504 for processing a change that a licensee is required to report to the
division under this section.
